Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Chapter 70. Grade Crossings

§ 3783.
Alteration, petition for; hearings.

The selectboard of a town within which a public highway crosses or is crossed by a railroad, or the general manager or attorney of a railroad corporation whose road crosses or is crossed by a public highway, may bring their petition in writing to the Transportation Board, alleging that public safety requires an alteration in such crossing, its approaches, the method of crossing, the location of the public highway, the elimination of such crossing, the closing of such public highway crossing and the substitution of another therefor, not at grade, or the removal of obstructions to the sight at such crossing, and praying that the same may be ordered, or such proceedings may be instituted by the Agency of Transportation or the Board of its own motion and without petition. The Board shall thereupon appoint a time and place for hearing the petition on notice of not less than ten days to the petitioners, the railroad, the municipality in which such crossing is situated, the owners of the land adjoining such crossing, and adjoining that part of the highway to be changed in grade, and to the Attorney General, who shall, by himself or herself or through the State’s Attorney of the county wherein the crossing is located, represent the interests of the State at such hearing. After such notice and hearing, the Board shall determine what alterations, changes, or removals, if any, shall be made and by whom.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 63.

§ 3784.
Grade crossings, alteration, expense apportionment.

The Board shall direct that the expense of any alterations, changes, or removals, referred to in sections 3783 and 3785 of this title, including the damages to any person whose land is taken, and the special damages which the owner of land adjoining the public highway shall sustain by reason of any change in the grade of the highway, be paid in whole or in part by the State and the corporation owning or operating the railroad which crosses the public highway, on the basis of benefits received by the public and the corporation respectively.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 267

, § 4, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1969, No. 76

, § 9.

§ 3785.
Alterations, crossings; order by Transportation Board.

When the Transportation Board, in the absence of any application therefor, is of the opinion that the public safety requires an alteration in any highway crossed at grade by a railroad, or by railroads belonging to or operated by more than one corporation, or an alteration in lands or buildings thereon adjoining or near such highway at or near such crossing in order to afford proper view from the approaches to such crossing, in each direction, of the track or tracks of such railroad or railroads, after hearing had on notice of not less than ten days to the corporation or corporations owning or operating such railroad or railroads, to the selectboard of the town within which such highway is situated, to the owners of the land adjoining such crossing and the owners of such land or buildings thereon adjoining, or near such highway as may be required for or materially affected by a proposed alteration, and to the Attorney General, who, by himself or herself or through the State’s Attorney of the county in which such crossing is located shall represent the interests of the State, it may order such alterations in such highway, and the removal of such obstructions to the view in each direction of the tracks of such railroads, as it deems best, and shall determine and direct by whom, at whose expense and within what time such alterations and removals shall be made.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 64.

§ 3786.
Tracks of more than one railroad.

When, upon an application or petition brought under the provisions of section 3783 of this title, the Board finds that a public highway crosses or is crossed by the tracks of more than one railroad and the tracks of such railroads are so near together that public convenience requires the work of separating the grades to be done under and in compliance with one order, it shall give notice to all the corporations operating such railroads to appear before it and be heard upon the application. After such notice and hearing, the Board shall determine what alterations shall be made, if any, so as to separate the grades of all such crossings at the same time, and shall determine by whom such work shall be done, and shall apportion the expense to be borne by the railroad corporations between such corporations in such manner as the Board deems just and proper.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 3787.
Taking of land, proceedings.

When a railroad corporation, a town, or any other party is ordered to do the requisite work in the alteration, changes, or removals at a railroad-highway crossing, or on lands or obstructions to the view near such crossing and it is necessary to take land to carry out such order, the party ordered to do the work shall cause such land to be surveyed and furnish a copy thereof to the owner of such land or his agent. Whereupon, in case the owner of such land and the parties ordered to do the work cannot agree on the price of the land and the damage to the owners resulting from such taking, either party in interest may make written application to the Board. After hearing had, on notice of not less than ten days to the same parties for whom notice is provided in section 3785 of this title, such Board shall first adjudge whether the taking of such land is necessary and, if so adjudged, shall appraise the same and award such damages for the taking thereof as are just.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 3788.
Orders of Board; appeals.

The order of the Board relating to any matter upon which it may act under the authority of this chapter shall be communicated in writing to the petitioners and to all persons to whom notice of the hearing on such petition was given. Any person aggrieved by such order, who was a party to such proceedings, may appeal from such order to the Superior Court in accordance with Rule 74 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 65.

§ 3789.
Record of changes.

The Transportation Board shall cause all orders made by it under the provisions of this chapter directing the alteration or relocation of a public highway to be recorded in the office of the town clerk where such public highway so altered or relocated is situated before such highway shall be opened for use by the public.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 66.

§ 3790.
Agency approval.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter allocating certain costs to the State or permitting the Transportation Board to make such allocations, no claim for reimbursement of the State’s share of any work may be asserted against the State unless the Secretary of Transportation, prior to commencement of the work for which reimbursement is sought, certified in writing that appropriated funds were available to pay the State’s share.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.